test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-Clex_tahhee_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - tahhee: # taken from affixes
    tahhee+N+Sg+Nom: tahhee
    tahhee+N+Sg+Gen: tahhee
    tahhee+N+Sg+Acc: tahhee
    tahhee+N+Sg+Ill: tahhei 
    tahhee+N+Sg+Loc: tahhest 
    tahhee+N+Sg+Com: tahhein
    tahhee+N+Sg+Abe: tahheettáá
    tahhee+N+Ess: tahhen
    tahhee+N+Par: tahhed
    tahhee+N+Pl+Nom: tahheeh
    tahhee+N+Pl+Gen: tahhei
    tahhee+N+Pl+Acc: tahheid
    tahhee+N+Pl+Ill: tahheid
    tahhee+N+Pl+Loc: tahhein
    tahhee+N+Pl+Com: tahheiguin
    tahhee+N+Pl+Abe: tahheittáá

  Noun - vyeijee: # 
    vyeijee+N+Sg+Nom: vyeiˊjee
    vyeijee+N+Sg+Gen: vyeiˊjee
    vyeijee+N+Sg+Acc: vyeiˊjee
    vyeijee+N+Sg+Ill: vyeiˊjei           
    vyeijee+N+Sg+Loc: vyeiˊjest 
    vyeijee+N+Sg+Com: vyeiˊjein
    vyeijee+N+Sg+Abe: vyeiˊjeettáá
    vyeijee+N+Ess: vyeiˊjen
    vyeijee+N+Par: vyeiˊjed
    vyeijee+N+Pl+Nom: vyeiˊjeeh
    vyeijee+N+Pl+Gen: vyeiˊjei
    vyeijee+N+Pl+Acc: vyeiˊjeid
    vyeijee+N+Pl+Ill: vyeiˊjeid
    vyeijee+N+Pl+Loc: vyeiˊjein
    vyeijee+N+Pl+Com: vyeiˊjeiguin
    vyeijee+N+Pl+Abe: vyeiˊjeittáá
    
  Noun - čuárvoo: # 
    čuárvoo+N+Sg+Nom: čuárvoo
    čuárvoo+N+Sg+Gen: čuárvoo
    čuárvoo+N+Sg+Acc: čuárvoo
    čuárvoo+N+Sg+Ill: čuárvoi 
    čuárvoo+N+Sg+Loc: čuárvost 
    čuárvoo+N+Sg+Com: čuárvoin
    čuárvoo+N+Sg+Abe: čuárvoottáá
    čuárvoo+N+Ess: čuárvon
    čuárvoo+N+Par: čuárvod
    čuárvoo+N+Pl+Nom: čuárvooh
    čuárvoo+N+Pl+Gen: čuárvoi
    čuárvoo+N+Pl+Acc: čuárvoid
    čuárvoo+N+Pl+Ill: čuárvoid
    čuárvoo+N+Pl+Loc: čuárvoin
    čuárvoo+N+Pl+Com: čuárvoiguin
    čuárvoo+N+Pl+Abe: čuárvoittáá

  Noun - orroo: # 
    orroo+N+Sg+Nom: orroo
    orroo+N+Sg+Gen: orroo
    orroo+N+Sg+Acc: orroo
    orroo+N+Sg+Ill: orroi 
    orroo+N+Sg+Loc: orrost 
    orroo+N+Sg+Com: orroin
    orroo+N+Sg+Abe: orroottáá
    orroo+N+Ess: orron
    orroo+N+Par: orrod
    orroo+N+Pl+Nom: orrooh
    orroo+N+Pl+Gen: orroi
    orroo+N+Pl+Acc: orroid
    orroo+N+Pl+Ill: orroid
    orroo+N+Pl+Loc: orroin
    orroo+N+Pl+Com: orroiguin
    orroo+N+Pl+Abe: orroittáá
